test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kieha_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kiehâ:
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Nom: kiehâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Gen: kieṿâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Acc: kieṿâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Ill: kiehân
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Loc: kieṿâst
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Com: kievˊváin
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Abe: kieˊṿâttáá
    kiehâ+N+Ess: kiehân
    kiehâ+N+Par: kiehâd
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Nom: kieṿah
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kieṿâi, kieˊṿâi]
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Acc: kieṿâid
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Ill: kievváid 
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Loc: kieṿâin
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Com: kieˊṿâiguin
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊṿâittáá

  Noun - juáhu: # ok LAAVU
    juáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  juáhu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  juáṿu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  juáhun
    juáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  juáṿust
    juáhu+N+Sg+Com:  juávˊvoin
    juáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  juáˊṿuttáá
    juáhu+N+Ess:  juáhun
    juáhu+N+Par:  juáhud
    juáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  juáṿuh
    juáhu+N+Pl+Gen: [juáṿui, juáˊṿui]
    juáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  juáṿuid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  juávvoid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  juáṿuin
    juáhu+N+Pl+Com:  juáˊṿuiguin
    juáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  juáˊṿuittáá

  Noun - mááhu: # ok LAAVU
    mááhu+N+Sg+Nom:  mááhu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Gen:  mááṿu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Sg+Loc:  mááṿust
    mááhu+N+Sg+Com:  mávvoin
    mááhu+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊṿuttáá
    mááhu+N+Ess:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Par:  mááhud
    mááhu+N+Pl+Nom:  mááṿuh
    mááhu+N+Pl+Gen: [mááṿui, máˊṿui]
    mááhu+N+Pl+Acc:  mááṿuid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Ill:  mávvoid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Loc:  mááṿuin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Com:  máˊṿuiguin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊṿuittáá

  Noun - ruáhu: # ok KALLU
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruáhu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruáṿu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruáṿu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruáhun
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruáṿust
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávˊvoin
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruáˊṿuttáá
    ruáhu+N+Ess:  ruáhun
    ruáhu+N+Par:  ruáhud
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruáṿuh
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruáṿui, ruáˊṿui]
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruáṿuid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávvoid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruáṿuin
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Com:  ruáˊṿuiguin
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruáˊṿuittáá

  Noun - saahâ:
    saahâ+N+Sg+Nom: saahâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Gen: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Acc: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Ill: saahân
    saahâ+N+Sg+Loc: saaṿâst
    saahâ+N+Sg+Com: savváin
    saahâ+N+Sg+Abe: saˊṿâttáá
    saahâ+N+Ess: saahân
    saahâ+N+Par: saahâd
    saahâ+N+Pl+Nom: saaṿah
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: [saaṿâi, saˊṿâi] 
    saahâ+N+Pl+Acc: saaṿâid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Ill: savváid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Loc: saaṿâin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Com: saˊṿâiguin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Abe: saˊṿâittáá

  Noun - laahâ:
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laahâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laaṿâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laaṿâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laaṿâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: lavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: laˊṿâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laaṿah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laaṿâi, laˊṿâi]
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laaṿâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laaṿâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: laˊṿâiguin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: laˊṿâittáá
     
  Noun - viehâ:
    viehâ+N+Sg+Nom: viehâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Gen: vieṿâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Acc: vieṿâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Ill: viehân
    viehâ+N+Sg+Loc: vieṿâst
    viehâ+N+Sg+Com: vievˊváin
    viehâ+N+Sg+Abe: vieˊṿâttáá
    viehâ+N+Ess: viehân
    viehâ+N+Par: viehâd
    viehâ+N+Pl+Nom: vieṿah
    viehâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vieṿâi, vieˊṿâi]
    viehâ+N+Pl+Acc: vieṿâid
    viehâ+N+Pl+Ill: vievváid 
    viehâ+N+Pl+Loc: vieṿâin
    viehâ+N+Pl+Com: vieˊṿâiguin
    viehâ+N+Pl+Abe: vieˊṿâittáá

  Noun - kaastâ:
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Nom: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Gen: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Acc: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Ill: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Loc: kaastâst
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Com: kastáin
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Abe: kaˊstâttáá
    kaastâ+N+Ess: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Par: kaastâd
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Nom: kaastah
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kaastâi, kaˊstâi]
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Acc: kaastâid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Ill: kastáid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Loc: kaastâin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Com: kaˊstâiguin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊstâittáá
